Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1411
Training center; admission; requirements; waive; when.

Upon the request of any sheriff, chief of police, or any other person having an equivalent title who is appointed or employed by the state or a subdivision thereof to exercise supervisory authority over law enforcement officers, the council may waive requirements for admission to the training center.

Laws 1969, c. 773, § 11, p. 2929;

Laws 1971, LB 929, § 5;

Laws 1994, LB 971, § 8.